Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4484.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; ACADEMY FOR SCIENCES AND AGRICULTURE.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Department of Education. new text end new text begin The sum indicated in this section is appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Education in the fiscal year designated. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Academy for Sciences and Agriculture. new text end new text begin (a) For a grant to the Academy for Sciences and Agriculture for greenhouse equipment upgrades: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin ....... new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin (b) This is a onetime appropriation. new text end